Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,242
Vehicles; slow moving; equipped with bracket.

All vehicles, equipment, or machinery sold in this state and required to display the emblem provided for in section 60-6,241 shall be equipped with a bracket on which such emblem may be mounted.

Laws 1967, c. 230, § 2, p. 607;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-723.11;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,126;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 338.